Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Extension or Contraction of Corporate Boundaries

§ 21-1-27.
Passing of ordinance [Subsections (2) and (3) repealed effective July 1, 2019].

The limits and boundaries of existing cities, towns and villages shall remain as now established until altered in the manner hereinafter provided. When any municipality shall desire to enlarge or contract the boundaries thereof by adding thereto adjacent unincorporated territory or excluding therefrom any part of the incorporated territory of such municipality, the governing authorities of such municipality shall pass an ordinance defining with certainty the territory proposed to be included in or excluded from the corporate limits, and also defining the entire boundary as changed. In the event the municipality desires to enlarge such boundaries, such ordinance shall in general terms describe the proposed improvements to be made in the annexed territory, the manner and extent of such improvements, and the approximate time within which such improvements are to be made; such ordinance shall also contain a statement of the municipal or public services which such municipality proposes to render in such annexed territory. In the event the municipality shall desire to contract its boundaries, such ordinance shall contain a statement of the reasons for such contraction and a statement showing whereby the public convenience and necessity would be served thereby.

When any municipality having a population in excess of forty thousand (40,000) wherein is located a state-supported university and in which U.S. Highways 49 and 11 intersect and which has boundaries that lie within two (2) counties desires to enlarge its boundaries by adding adjacent unincorporated territory after January 1, 2016, the governing authorities of the municipality shall pass, in addition to the requirements provided in subsection (1), an ordinance:

Certifying that more than fifty percent (50%) of the people who reside in the unincorporated area of the census block within the territory proposed to be annexed shall be included in the proposed annexation; or

Certifying that upon approval of the annexation, the municipality shall cede any authority to provide zoning and subdivision regulation to the board of supervisors of the county in which the territory is located, if fifty percent (50%) or fewer people who reside in the unincorporated area of the census block within such territory is included in the proposed annexation. If such authority is ceded, as provided under this subparagraph, then the governing authorities of the municipality is authorized to advise the board of supervisors of the county concerning such regulation; however, the ultimate authority regarding the regulation shall lie with the board of supervisors of the county.

This subsection (2) shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2019.

For the purposes of this section, “census block” refers to certain geographic areas as designated by the latest federal decennial census preceding any annexation under this section.

This subsection (3) shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2019.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2912a; 1906, § 3301; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5797; 1930, § 2371; 1942, § 3374-10; Laws, 1902, ch. 103; Laws, 1910, ch. 230; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 10; Laws, 2016, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 21-1-29.
Preparing and filing of petition.

When any such ordinance shall be passed by the municipal authorities, such municipal authorities shall file a petition in the chancery court of the county in which such municipality is located; however, when a municipality wishes to annex or extend its boundaries across and into an adjoining county such municipal authorities shall file a petition in the chancery court of the county in which such territory is located. The petition shall recite the fact of the adoption of such ordinance and shall pray that the enlargement or contraction of the municipal boundaries, as the case may be, shall be ratified, approved and confirmed by the court. There shall be attached to such petition, as exhibits thereto, a certified copy of the ordinance adopted by the municipal authorities and a map or plat of the municipal boundaries as they will exist in event such enlargement or contraction becomes effective.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-11; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 11; Laws, 1960, ch. 422.

§ 21-1-31.
Publication of notice of proposed enlargement or contraction.

Upon the filing of such petition and upon application therefor by the petitioner, the chancellor shall fix a date certain, either in term time or in vacation, when a hearing on said petition will be held, and notice thereof shall be given in the same manner and for the same length of time as is provided in Section 21-1-15 with regard to the creation of municipal corporations, and all parties interested in, affected by, or being aggrieved by said proposed enlargement or contraction shall have the right to appear at such hearing and present their objection to such proposed enlargement or contraction. However, in all cases of the enlargement of municipalities where any of the territory proposed to be incorporated is located within three miles of another existing municipality, then such other existing municipality shall be made a party defendant to said petition and shall be served with process in the manner provided by law, which process shall be served at least thirty days prior to the date set for the hearing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-12; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-33.
Hearing on petition; decree.

If the chancellor finds from the evidence presented at the hearing that the proposed enlargement or contraction is reasonable and is required by the public convenience and necessity and, in the event of an enlargement of a municipality, that reasonable public and municipal services will be rendered in the annexed territory within a reasonable time and that the governing authority of the municipality complied with the provisions of Section 21-1-27, the chancellor shall enter a decree approving, ratifying and confirming the proposed enlargement or contraction, and describing the boundaries of the municipality as altered. In so doing the chancellor shall have the right and the power to modify the proposed enlargement or contraction by decreasing the territory to be included in or excluded from the municipality, as the case may be.

If the chancellor shall find from the evidence that the proposed enlargement or contraction, as the case may be, is unreasonable and is not required by the public convenience and necessity, or in the event of an enlargement of a municipality, that the governing authority of the municipality failed to comply with the provisions of Section 21-1-27, then he shall enter a decree denying the enlargement or contraction.

In any event, the decree of the chancellor shall become effective after the passage of ten (10) days from the date thereof or, in the event an appeal is taken therefrom, within ten (10) days from the final determination of the appeal. In any proceeding under this section the burden shall be upon the municipal authorities to show that the proposed enlargement or contraction is reasonable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-13; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 13; Laws, 2016, ch. 443, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 21-1-35.
Costs.

In the event no objection is made to the petition for the enlargement or contraction of the municipal boundaries, the municipality shall be taxed with all costs of the proceedings. In the event objection is made, such costs may be taxed in such manner as the chancellor shall determine to be equitable pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure. In the event of an appeal from the judgment of the chancellor, the costs incurred in the appeal shall be taxed against the appellant if the judgment be affirmed, and against the appellee if the judgment be reversed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-16; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 16; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 107, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 21-1-37.
Appeal.

If the municipality or any other interested person who was a party to the proceedings in the chancery court be aggrieved by the decree of the chancellor, then such municipality or other person may prosecute an appeal therefrom within the time and in the manner and with like effect as is provided in Section 21-1-21 in the case of appeals from the decree of the chancellor with regard to the creation of a municipal corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2913; 1906, §§ 3303, 3304; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5799, 5800; 1930, §§ 2373, 2374; 1942, § 3374-14; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-39.
Copy of decree sent to secretary of state.

Whenever the corporate limits of any municipality shall be enlarged or contracted, as herein provided, the chancery clerk shall, after the expiration of ten days from the date of such decree if no appeal be taken therefrom, forward to the secretary of state a certified copy of such decree, which shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and shall remain a permanent record thereof. In the event an appeal be taken from such decree and such decree is affirmed, then the certified copy thereof shall be forwarded to the secretary of state within ten days after receipt of the mandate from the supreme court notifying the clerk of such affirmance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-15; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-41.
Chancery clerk to be furnished map or plat of alterations.

In all cases where the limits of a municipality are enlarged or contracted the municipal authorities shall furnish to the chancery clerk a map or plat of the boundaries of the municipality as altered. Such map or plat shall be recorded in the official plat book of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-15; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1950.